Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2014
Construction projects; hearing; approval; recommendation of department.

The department shall afford to every applicant for a construction project an opportunity for a fair hearing. If the department, after affording reasonable opportunity for development and presentation of applications in the order of relative need, finds that a project application complies with the requirements of section 71-2013 and is otherwise in conformity with the state plan, such application shall be approved and shall be recommended and forwarded to the Surgeon General.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 14, p. 738;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 516.